Illinois, session 104th, HB1585.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 10-47 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-47)7    Sec. 10-47. Teen Responsibility, Education, Achievement, 8Caring, and Hope (Teen REACH) Grant Program.9    (a) It is the purpose and intent of this Section to 10establish a State grant program to support local communities 11in providing after-school opportunities for youth 6 to 17 12years of age that will improve their likelihood for future 13success, provide positive choices, reduce at-risk behaviors, 14and develop career goals.15    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall award 16competitive grants under a Teen Responsibility, Education, 17Achievement, Caring, and Hope (Teen REACH) Grant Program to 18community-based agencies in accordance with this Section and 19other rules and regulations that may be adopted by the 20Department. 21    (c) Successful grantees under the Teen REACH Grant Program 22shall plan and implement activities that address outcomes 23associated with 6 core services:   HB1585- 2 -LRB104 07691 KTG 17735 b1        (1) the improvement of educational performance; 2        (2) life skills education; 3        (3) parental education; 4        (4) recreation, sports, cultural, and artistic 5    activities; 6        (5) the development of positive adult mentors; and 7        (6) service learning opportunities. 8    (d) Successful grantees under the Teen REACH Grant Program 9shall be in compliance with policies and procedures on 10program, data, and expense reporting as developed by the 11Department, in consultation with the Governor's Office of 12Management and Budget. 13    (d-1) Any technical assistance provided to a statewide 14provider of services under the Teen REACH Grant Program shall 15be delivered directly by the Department of Human Services and 16shall not be delegated or outsourced to a third-party 17organization. 18    (e) The Department may adopt any rules necessary to 19implement this Section. 20(Source: P.A. 99-700, eff. 1-1-17.)